Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-305 Transfer of securities.
(a) No transfer of any funds or security so held on deposit, whether voluntary
or by operation of law, shall be valid unless approved in writing by the
commissioner and countersigned by the director of finance or by the director's
authorized deputy or agent, or unless expressly provided elsewhere in this
code.

(b) A statement of each such transfer shall be
entered on the records of the director, showing the name of the insurer from
whose deposit the transfer is made, the name of the transferee, the par value
of securities having par value, and the asset value of other securities as at
last recent valuation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next